California statutes. Insurance Code
Such insurers may invest in bonds of any permanent road division in this state, or any district organized under the laws of this state, when such bonds are legal investments for savings banks of this state, or have been certified as legal investments for savings banks pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 20000) of the Water Code, or when the statutes or laws providing for the issuance of such bonds provide that such bonds shall be entitled to the same force or value or use as bonds issued by any municipality, or such law specifically states that such bonds shall be legal investments for either savings banks, insurance companies, all trust funds, state school funds or any funds which may be invested in bonds of cities, counties, cities and counties, school districts, or municipalities in the state, or when such bonds have been investigated and approved by a commission or board now or hereafter authorized by law to conduct such investigation and give such approval when such law specifies that upon that approval the bonds are legal investments for insurers, or which the commissioner approves in writing as legal for investment of the funds of insurers. The commissioner in determining whether to approve any bonds as legal investments which do not otherwise qualify as such pursuant to any part of this code, shall, at the expense of any insurer requesting approval, make an adequate independent investigation of such bonds and the security therefor. A copy of the data secured in such investigation and the resulting opinion of the commissioner shall be furnished to the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1175.5.

Such insurers may invest in bonds of any county water district operating under Division 12 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1653.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.5.

Such insurers may make, invest in or purchase loans which are guaranteed by the United States or any agency thereof pursuant to the provisions of the “Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944” or any act of Congress supplementary or amendatory thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.6.

None of the provisions of the Insurance Code limiting or restricting loans by insurers or prescribing the security therefor shall apply to any loans which are fully guaranteed by the United States or any agency thereof pursuant to the provisions of the “Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944” or any act of Congress supplementary or amendatory thereof; and in any case in which payment of a portion of any loan is guaranteed by the United States or any agency thereof pursuant to the provisions of the “Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944” or any act of Congress supplementary or amendatory thereof, the guaranteed portion of such loan shall not be deemed a part of said loan for the purposes of any provision of the Insurance Code limiting the amount which may be loaned by an insurer upon the security of real property or improvements thereon shall be applicable to such loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.

Such insurers may invest in notes or bonds secured by mortgage guaranteed as to payment by a policy of mortgage insurance, and mortgage participation certificates issued by a mortgage insurer in accordance with the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.

Such insurers may invest in collateral trust bonds or notes, secured by any of the following:

(a) A deposit of obligations authorized for investment by this article or Articles 4, 5, or 6 of this chapter having a market value at least fifteen per cent in excess of the par value of the collateral trust bonds or notes issued.

(b) A deposit of obligations authorized for investment by this article or Articles 4, 5, or 6 of this chapter, together with other securities, the combined market value of the deposit being at least twenty per cent in excess of the par value of the collateral trust bonds or notes issued, with the par value of the collateral trust bonds or notes not exceeding the market value of the deposited obligations which are authorized for investment by this article or Articles 4, 5, or 6 of this chapter.

(c) A deposit of obligations authorized for investment by this article, or Articles 4, 5, or 6 of this chapter, together with other securities, and conforming to the following requirements:

(1) The combined market value of the deposit is at least thirty per cent in excess of the par value of the collateral trust bonds or notes issued.

(2) The par value of such collateral trust bonds or notes issued does not exceed the market value of deposited obligations authorized for investment by this article.

(3) The deposited collateral consists of obligations authorized for investment by this article, or Articles 4, 5, or 6 of this chapter, having a market value of at least seventy-five per cent of the par value of such collateral trust bonds or notes issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 738.)
-------------------------------------------

1179.

Such insurers may invest in farm loan bonds, consolidated farm loan bonds, collateral trust debentures, consolidated debentures, or other obligations issued under the Federal Farm Loan Act, approved July 17, 1916, as amended (Title 12 U.S.C. Sections 636 to 1012 inclusive, and Sections 1021 to 1129 inclusive), and the Farm Credit Act of 1933, as amended (Title 12 U.S.C. Sections 1131 to 1138f inclusive), and the Farm Credit Act of 1971 (Title 12 U.S.C. Sections 2001 to 2259 inclusive). Under this section such insurers may invest in farm loan bonds and consolidated farm loan bonds issued by federal land banks, consolidated collateral trust debentures and all other debentures issued by federal intermediate credit banks, debentures issued by the Central Bank for Cooperatives and consolidated debentures issued by banks for cooperatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.

Such insurers may invest in bonds issued under the “Home Owners’ Loan Act of 1933”; bonds, debentures and notes issued by any federal home loan bank, or consolidated federal home loan bank notes, bonds and debentures issued by the Federal Home Loan Bank Board in accordance with the provisions of the Federal Home Loan Bank Act, and mortgage, mortgage participation, pass-through or trust certificates, or obligations or other securities issued or guaranteed by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, pursuant to Section 305 or Section 306 of the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation Act (12 U.S.C. Secs. 1454, 1455), by the Government National Mortgage Association, pursuant to Section 306 or Section 313 or Title III of the National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. Secs. 1721, 1723(e)), or by the Federal National Mortgage Association pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sections 1717–1719.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 811, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

1181.

Such insurers may also invest in registered warrants of this State, issued pursuant to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 738.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.

Domestic incorporated insurers may invest in an account or accounts in one or more banks, savings and loan associations, or credit unions to the extent the account or accounts are insured by an agency or instrumentality of the federal government. As used in this section, an account may include a certificate of deposit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 234, Sec. 8.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Disclosure of Material Transactions [1185. - 1187.]

1185.

(a) Every domestic incorporated insurer shall file a report with the commissioner disclosing material acquisitions and dispositions of assets or material nonrenewals, cancellations, or revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements unless the acquisitions and dispositions of assets or material nonrenewals, cancellations, or revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements have been submitted to the commissioner for review, approval, or information purposes pursuant to other provisions of this code, laws, regulations, or other requirements.

(b) The report shall be filed within 15 days after the end of the calendar month in which any of the foregoing transactions occur.

(c) One complete copy of the report, including any exhibits or other attachments filed as part thereof, shall be filed with the department and the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(d) All reports obtained by, or disclosed to the commissioner pursuant to this article, shall be given confidential treatment and shall not be subject to subpoena and shall not be made public by the commissioner, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or any other person, except to insurance departments of other states, without the prior written consent of the insurer to which it pertains unless the commissioner, after giving the insurer who would be affected thereby, notice and an opportunity to be heard, determines that the interest of policyholders, shareholders, or the public will be served by the publication thereof, in which event the commissioner may publish all or any part thereof in such manner as he or she may deem appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1186.

(a) No acquisitions or dispositions of assets shall be reported pursuant to Section 1185 if the acquisitions or dispositions are not material. For purposes of this article, a material acquisition (or the aggregate of any series of related acquisitions during any 30-day period) or disposition (or the aggregate of any series of related dispositions during any 30-day period) is one that is nonrecurring and not in the ordinary course of business and involves more than 5 percent of the reporting insurer’s total admitted assets as reported in its most recent statutory statement filed with the insurance department of the insurer’s state of domicile.

(b) Asset acquisitions subject to this article include every purchase, lease, exchange, merger, consolidation, succession, or other acquisition other than the construction or development of real property by or for the reporting insurer or the acquisition of materials for that purpose. Asset dispositions also include every sale, lease, exchange, merger, consolidation, mortgage, hypothecation, assignment (whether for the benefit of creditors or otherwise), abandonment, destruction, or other disposition.

(c) The following information is required to be disclosed in any report of a material acquisition or disposition of assets:

(1) Date of the transaction.

(2) Manner of acquisition or disposition.

(3) Description of the assets involved.

(4) Nature and amount of the consideration given or received.

(5) Purpose of, or reason for, the transaction.

(6) Manner by which the amount of consideration was determined.

(7) Gain or loss recognized or realized as a result of the transaction.

(8) Name of the person from whom the assets were acquired or to whom they were disposed.

(d) Insurers shall report material acquisitions and dispositions on a nonconsolidated basis unless the insurer is part of a consolidated group of insurers which utilizes a pooling arrangement or 100 percent reinsurance agreement that affects the solvency and integrity of the insurer’s reserves and that insurer ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to the pool. An insurer is deemed to have ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to a pool if the insurer has less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) total direct plus assumed written premiums during a calendar year that are not subject to a pooling arrangement and the net income of the business not subject to the pooling arrangement represents less than 5 percent of the insurer’s capital and surplus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1187.

(a) No nonrenewals, cancellations, or revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements shall be reported pursuant to Section 1185 if the nonrenewals, cancellations, or revisions are not material. For purposes of this article, a material nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision is one that affects for property and casualty business, including accident and health business when written as such, more than 50 percent of an insurer’s ceded written premium, or for life, annuity, and accident and health business, more than 50 percent of the total reserve credit taken for business ceded, on an annualized basis as indicated in the insurer’s most recently filed statutory statement; provided, however, that no filing is required if the insurer’s ceded written premium or the total reserve credit taken for business ceded represents, on an annualized basis, less than 10 percent of direct plus assumed written premium or 10 percent of the statutory reserve requirement prior to any cession, respectively.

(b) Subject to the criteria specified in subdivision (a), a report is to be filed without regard to which party has initiated the nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision of ceded reinsurance whenever one or more of the following conditions exist:

(1) The entire cession has been canceled, nonrenewed, or revised and ceded indemnity and loss adjustment expense reserves after any nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision represent less than 50 percent of the comparable reserves that would have been ceded had the nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision not occurred.

(2) An authorized or accredited reinsurer has been replaced on an existing cession by an unauthorized reinsurer.

(3) Collateral requirements previously established for unauthorized reinsurers have been reduced; for example, the requirement to collateralize incurred but not reported (IBNR) claim reserves has been waived with respect to one or more unauthorized reinsurers newly participating in an existing cession.

(4) Subject to the materiality criteria, for purposes of paragraphs (2) and (3), a report shall be filed if the result of the revision affects more than 10 percent of the cession.

(c) The following information is required to be disclosed in any report of a material nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision of ceded reinsurance agreements:

(1) Effective date of the nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision.

(2) The description of the transaction with an identification of the initiator thereof.

(3) Purpose of, or reason for, the transaction.

(4) If applicable, the identity of the replacement reinsurers.

(d) Insurers shall report all material nonrenewals, cancellations, or revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements on a nonconsolidated basis unless the insurer is part of a consolidated group of insurers which utilizes a pooling arrangement or 100 percent reinsurance agreement that affects the solvency and integrity of the insurer’s reserves and the insurer ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to the pool. An insurer is deemed to have ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to a pool if the insurer has less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) total direct plus assumed written premiums during a calendar year that are not subject to a pooling arrangement and the net income of the business not subject to the pooling arrangement represents less than 5 percent of the insurer’s capital and surplus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property Authorized for Excess Funds Investments [1190. - 1202.]

1190.

Any domestic incorporated insurer, which maintains in cash on hand or on deposit in a national or state bank, or in securities specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1170), an amount equal to its required minimum paid-in capital, may invest the remainder of its assets in the purchase of, or loans upon the securities set forth in this article. The investments are known as excess funds investments and are subject to the restrictions set forth in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.

Excess funds investments may be made in the stock of any corporation organized and carrying on business under the laws of this or any other state, or of the United States, or of the District of Columbia, or of the Dominion of Canada or of any province of the Dominion of Canada.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.1.

Excess fund investments may be made in the purchase and sale of exchange traded call options on common stock pursuant to this section.

An insurer may sell exchange traded call options only through an exchange and only with respect to stock which it owns. Common stock that is obligated under an unexpired written call option shall not be sold unless the insurer first enters into a closing purchase transaction. An insurer shall not sell any other options pursuant to this section.

An insurer may purchase exchange traded call options only through an exchange and only for the
 purpose of a closing purchase transaction. An insurer shall not purchase any other options pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 814, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.5.

(a)Excess fund investments may be made by a domestic life insurer having admitted assets aggregating in value not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in the purchase and sale of call options on interest-bearing obligations pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c). These investments may be made only in options on interest-bearing obligations issued by the United States of America, or any of its agencies or instrumentalities specified in Section 1180.

(b) An insurer may purchase call options pursuant to this section for the sole purpose of executing a closing
 purchase transaction for the interest-bearing obligation subject to the option. An insurer shall not purchase any other options pursuant to this section.

(c) An insurer may sell call options pursuant to this section only on interest-bearing obligations that it owns. An insurer shall not sell an interest-bearing obligation subject to an unexpired written call option sold by it except pursuant to a closing purchase transaction under the call option.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1129, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.

Excess funds investments may be made in:

(a) Interest-bearing obligations issued by a nonaffiliate institution, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (f) of Section 1196.1, organized under the laws of any state, or of the United States, or of the District of Columbia, or of the Dominion of Canada or of any province of the Dominion of Canada, or interest-bearing obligations registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission and publicly traded issued by an affiliate corporation organized under the laws of any state, or of the United States, or of the District of Columbia, or of the Dominion of Canada or of any province of the Dominion of Canada, or interest-bearing obligations issued by an authority established pursuant to the California Industrial Development Financing Act
 provided for in Title 10 (commencing with Section 91500) of the Government Code, to which the corporation is obligated with respect to payment, or

(b) Equipment trust obligations or certificates, or other adequately secured instruments, evidencing an interest in or lien upon transportation equipment used or to be used by a common carrier or common carriers and a right to receive determined portions of fixed obligatory payments for the use or purchase of this equipment, when the obligations, certificates, or instruments are issued by a corporation specified in subdivision (a) or are unconditionally guaranteed or assumed by the corporation as to principal and as to interest or dividends and as to the payment of the fixed obligatory payments or the payment of the determined portions thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 216.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.1.

Excess funds investments may be made in bonds, notes or other obligations issued, assumed or guaranteed by the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, or the Inter-American Development Bank, or the Government Development Bank for Puerto Rico, or the Asian Development Bank, the International Finance Corporation, or the African Development Bank. Investments held under the authority of this section at any one time shall not be in excess of 212 percent of the insurer’s admitted assets or an amount equal to 25 percent of the total of the capital
 and surplus of such insurer, whichever is the lesser. Percentage or dollar value of assets and surplus as provided herein shall be determined by the insurer’s last preceding annual statement of conditions and affairs filed with the commissioner pursuant to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1206, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.2.

An insurer may lend on the security of a first lien on an unencumbered leasehold on real property if:

(a) The real property subject to the leasehold is primarily improved by a single family residence, the term of the loan does not exceed 30 years, and the amount of the loan plus the amount of the liens of any public bond, assessment or tax assessed upon the property loaned upon does not exceed 75 percent of the sound market value of the leasehold for loan purposes as determined by appraisal; or 

(b) The real property subject to the leasehold is not
 primarily improved by a single family residence, the term of the loan does not exceed 30 years, and the amount of the loan plus the amount of the liens of any public bond, assessment or tax assessed upon the property loaned upon does not exceed 6623 percent of the sound market value of the leasehold for loan purposes as determined by appraisal; or

(c) Where the loan is a building loan, the principal so loaned plus the amount of the liens of any public bond, assessment or tax assessed upon the property subject to said leasehold at no time exceeds 75 percent if made upon the kind of property and improvements referred to in (a) above or if other than referred to in (a) above, at no time exceeds 6623 percent of the sound market value of the leasehold
 for loan purposes as determined by appraisal, including the actual cost of the improvements thereon taken as security; or

(d) The loan is fully guaranteed or fully insured or covered by a commitment to fully guarantee or fully insure by the United States, the Federal Housing Administrator, or by any other agency of the United States which the commissioner shall have approved for the purposes of this subdivision as an issuer of insurance or guarantees of loans on real property, whether the proceeds of the guarantee or insurance is payable in cash or in obligations of the United States; or

(e) The loan is fully guaranteed by the United States or any agency thereof pursuant to the “Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944” or any act of Congress supplementary or amendatory thereof, or, if a portion of the loan is so guaranteed, then if the unguaranteed portion of the loan does not
 exceed 75 percent of the sound market value of the leasehold for loan purposes as determined by appraisal.

(f) In all cases mentioned in subsections (a), (b), (c) and (e), the loan must be repayable in equal installments not less often than annually in amounts sufficient to completely amortize the loan within three-fourths of the remaining term of the leasehold including options to renew exercisable by the lender.

A leasehold on real property is not encumbered within the meaning of this section if subject only to one or more of the following: (a) the lien of taxes and assessments not delinquent at the time of investment, (b) the lien for delinquent taxes or assessments delinquent at the time of investment, which are being contested by any legal proceedings, provided that indemnity has been given pursuant to the indenture under which the bonds and notes are issued, or otherwise, for the payment of any
 amount which may be found to be due upon the final adjudication of such contest, (c) the lien of taxes and assessment becoming delinquent subsequent to the time of investment, (d) outstanding mineral, oil or timber rights, (e) easements or rights-of-way, (f) sewer rights, (g) rights in walls, (h) building restrictions or other restrictive covenants, or conditions or regulations of use, or subleases under which rents or profits are reserved to the owner.

For the purposes of this section, delinquent taxes funded on any deferred payment plan shall be deemed delinquent.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.3.

Excess fund investments may be made by a life insurer having admitted assets aggregating in value not less than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) in the following:

(a) Equipment obligations, securities, or certificates of any equipment trust evidencing rights to receive partial payments agreed to be made upon any contract of leasing or conditional sale.

(b) The purchase and ownership of machinery or equipment, which is or will within 30 days after acquisition become subject to contracts for sale or use under which
 contractual payments may reasonably be expected to return the principal of and provide earnings on the investment within the anticipated useful life of the property which shall be not less than five years.

Except upon the prior approval, in writing, of the commissioner, an investment may not be made under the authority of this section if at the time of the making of such investment it would result in such insurer then owning such obligations, securities, certificates, machinery and equipment in an amount exceeding five percent of such insurer’s admitted assets as determined by the insurer’s last preceding annual statement filed with the commissioner.

Any investment in a single piece of machinery or equipment shall not be made in excess of one percent of the insurer’s admitted assets or 10 percent of the aggregate of the insurer’s capital paid-up and unassigned surplus, whichever is larger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1049, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.4.

No domestic insurer shall have more than 10 percent of its capital and surplus invested in stock of corporations organized under the laws of the Dominion of Canada or of any province of the Dominion of Canada, but this limitation shall not affect the authority conferred by Sections 1172, 1199 and 1240.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 206.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.5.

Excess funds investments may be made in all deposits and debt obligations of banks or savings and loan associations whose accounts are insured by an agency or instrumentality of the federal government including accounts or certificates of deposit not subject to Section 1182, bankers’ acceptances, and commercial paper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 539, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.6.

(a) An insurer, except an insurer authorized to transact mortgage guaranty insurance as defined in Section 119, may invest in a mortgage, mortgage-backed bond, or a mortgage participation, pass-through, conventional pass-through, trust or participation certificate, which is secured by or represents an undivided interest in any loan secured by real property if the loan is a permitted investment for the insurer or in a pool of those loans if each is a permitted investment for an insurer; and for which there exists, at the time of making the investment, a resale market.

(b) If the loan or pools of loans have been transferred or contributed by an insurer to a corporation, all the voting securities of which are owned by the insurer, then the mortgage, mortgage-backed bond, or mortgage participation, pass-through, conventional pass-through, trust or participation certificate secured by or representing an undivided interest in the loan or pool of loans shall not be revalued solely due to that transfer. Any subsequent transfer to an affiliate from the wholly owned subsidiary shall be valued at the lower of book value or market value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 242, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.7.

(a) A domestic insurer having admitted assets aggregating in value not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) may make excess funds investments in participation certificates (1) which represent an undivided interest in an interest-bearing obligation issued by a corporation and (2) for which a resale market exists at the time the investment is made.

(b) No investment in a participation certificate may be made pursuant to this section unless the entire obligation is
 a form of investment which the insurer would be authorized to acquire pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1192.

(c) An investment may not be made under the authority of this section if at the time of making the investment it would result in the insurer then owning participation certificates described in this section in an amount exceeding 4 percent of the insurer’s admitted assets as determined by the insurer’s last preceding annual statement filed with the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.8.

(a) A domestic life insurer having admitted assets aggregating in value not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) may make excess fund investments pursuant to this section in interest-bearing notes, bonds, or obligations issued by (1) any operating business trust or limited partnership organized under the laws of any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Dominion of Canada, any province of the Dominion of Canada or (2) an authority established pursuant to the California Industrial Development Financing Act, Title 10 (commencing with Section 91500) of the Government Code. The issuer of the notes, bonds, or obligations through itself or its paying agent shall be obligated thereunder to make payments, with respect to the notes, bonds, or other obligations,
 directly to the insurer or the insurer’s nominee.

(b) Except upon the prior written approval of the commissioner, an investment may not be made under the authority of this section unless the note, bond, or obligation is exchange-traded. “Exchange-traded,” as used in this subdivision, means listed and traded on the National Market System of the NASDAQ Stock Market or on a securities exchange subject to regulation, supervision, or control under a statute of the United States and acceptable to the commissioner.

(c) Without the prior written consent of the commissioner, an investment made pursuant to this section shall not exceed in the aggregate 10 percent of the life insurer’s policyholder surplus.

(d) A request to the commissioner for (1) approval pursuant to subdivision (b) to invest in notes, bonds, or obligations
 that are not exchange-traded or (2) consent to exceed the 10 percent limitation set forth in subdivision (c), shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by any supporting data and documentation that the commissioner may require. The commissioner shall require the payment of a fee of seven thousand four hundred seventy-two dollars ($7,472), in advance, for the determination of whether to approve or disapprove each request. Each request shall be in writing and shall be deemed approved unless the commissioner disapproves it within 60 days with respect to requests under subdivision (c) or 20 days with respect to requests under subdivision (b), after the request has been filed in the commissioner’s office.

(e) This section shall not be construed to increase or reduce the authority to invest in any operating business trust or limited partnership specifically permitted in other sections of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 26.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.9.

Notwithstanding Section 1100, a domestic insurer may make excess funds investments in shares of an investment company, as defined in the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, if the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) are satisfied. No investment made pursuant to this section that ceases to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (b) or (c) shall be retained as an excess fund investment. No domestic insurer shall invest
 under any provision of this code in the shares of any investment company that has more than 33.33 percent of its investments in foreign investments that do not comply with paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to the following terms when used in this section:

(1) A mutual fund is an open-end management company as defined in Section 5(a)(1) of the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80(a)-5(a)(1)).

(2) An exchange traded fund is either an open-end management company as defined in Section 5(a)(1) of the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, or a unit investment trust as defined in Section 4(2) of the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-4(2)), that is registered under the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940 and that satisfies the
 terms of exemptive orders issued by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission that qualify it to be an exchange-traded fund.

(3) A fund is any investment company authorized in this section as an excess fund investment.

(b) The investment company shall:

(1) Be registered with and reporting to the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(2) Be domiciled in the United States.

(3) Have assets in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or be affiliated with other investment companies that have, in the aggregate, assets in excess of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000).

(4) Have at least 66.67
 percent of its investments be investments that are authorized under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1170) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 1190), except that any amount of a fund’s assets may consist of foreign investments, provided that if more than 50 percent of its total investments consist of foreign investments, then the insurer’s investment in that fund shall comply with the provisions of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), notwithstanding any other provision of this section or this code.

(5) Have at least 36 months of active investment history.

(6) Issue its shares as fully paid and nonassessable, with no preemptive, conversion, or exchange rights.

(7) Issue its shares to the insurer or to the insurer’s custodian, subcustodian, or depository designated pursuant to Section 1104.9, or
 have its shares be retained by a bank, trust company, or other entity other than the investment company that is authorized by the United States to act as a transfer and dividend paying agent for the investment company, provided that, notwithstanding any other provision of this code, Section 1104.9 shall not apply to the assets or investments held by the investment company.

(8) Provide equal rights and privileges to each share within the same class or series, and entitle each share within its class or series to vote and to participate equally in dividends and distributions declared by the investment company and in the net distributable assets of the investment company on liquidation.

(9) If it is a mutual fund, entitle shareholders to require the investment company to redeem all shares.

(10) If it is an
 exchange-traded fund, all of its shares are both of the following:

(A) Registered under the Federal Securities Act of 1933.

(B) Either listed and traded on a national securities exchange registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or have prices ascertained by quotations furnished through a nationwide automated quotations system approved by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority.

(11) Have no investment policies that authorize any of the following:

(A) Borrowings to exceed 3313 percent of its total assets.

(B) The aggregate notional value of its derivative instruments
 outstanding to exceed 10 percent of its total assets.

(C) Investment in commodities or direct ownership of real estate.

(12) Have an expense ratio that does not exceed the following amounts of its average daily net asset values:

(A) For a money market fund, 100 basis points.

(B) For a bond fund, 200 basis points.

(C) For a stock or mixed stock/bond fund, 300 basis points.

(c) An insurer shall do the following:

(1) At no time make or retain an excess fund investment under the authority of this section that exceeds the following limits:

(A) An amount of its admitted assets, as reported in its most recent annual statement, that is more than any of the following:

(i) Three percent in a single investment company or 7 percent in an affiliated group of investment companies.

(ii) Twenty-five percent in all investments authorized by this section.

(B) One hundred percent of its surplus as regards policyholders, as reported in its most recent annual statement, in all investments authorized by this section.

(C) For an investment in a fund that has more than 50 percent of its assets in foreign investments, those foreign investments shall be foreign investments as defined by Section 1240 and shall be considered foreign investments,
 investments denominated in foreign currencies, or both, as applicable, for purposes of the limitations set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1241. No insurer shall invest in any such fund pursuant to any other provision of this code.

(D) An investment in any single investment company that exceeds 10 percent of the total net asset value of that investment company.

(2) Make a specific determination, pursuant to Sections 1200 and 1201, that an investment company has stated investment policies that are suitable for the insurer’s investment objectives.

(d) In addition to any other remedies available under this code for any violation of this section, the commissioner may, after giving an insurer notice and an opportunity to be heard, deny credit in any financial statement filed with the commissioner for all or
 any part of an investment in an investment company, even if it otherwise complies with this section, if he or she finds the investment to be unsound or hazardous.

The grounds for finding an investment unsound or hazardous may include, but are not limited to, the following determinations:

(1) The investment company’s investment adviser or subadviser lacks sufficient investment experience to render reliable investment advice; or lacks good professional character or good standing with any securities licensing authorities having jurisdiction over them.

(2) The portfolio turnover rate of the investment company is excessive in relation to its investment goals.

(3) The investment company’s annual investment management fee, or other fees or charges incurred by the investment company
 or the insurer, are not reasonable when compared to charges or fees associated with similar investment companies.
